Wyoming, session 2025, HB0280.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 7-19-302(h) and (j) is amended to
read:
7-19-302. Registration of offenders; procedure;
verification; fees.
(h) For an offender convicted of a violation of W.S.
6-2-304(a)(iii) if the victim was at least fourteen (14)
years of age, W.S. 6-2-314(a)(ii) and (iii), 6-2-315(a)(i)
and (iii), W.S. 6-2-315(a)(iv) if the victim was thirteen
(13) through fifteen (15) years of age, W.S. 6-2-317(a)(i)
and (ii) or 6-2-318, W.S. 6-2-706, W.S. 6-4-102 if the
person solicited was a minor, W.S. 6-4-103 if the person
enticed or compelled was a minor, W.S. 6-4-302(a)(i) if the
offense involves the use of a minor in a sexual performance
or W.S. 6-4-303(b)(i) through (iii), 18 U.S.C. § 2251, an
offense in another jurisdiction containing the same or
similar elements, or arising out of the same or similar
facts or circumstances as a criminal offense specified in
this subsection, an attempt or conspiracy to commit any of
the offenses specified in this subsection, or any offense
enumerated in subsection (g) of this section if the
offender was previously convicted of any offense enumerated
in subsection (g) of this section, the division shall
verify the accuracy of the offender's registered address,
and the offender shall report, in person, his current
address to the sheriff in the county in which the offender
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0280
ENROLLED ACT NO. 72, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
resides, every six (6) months after the date of the initial
release or commencement of parole. If the offender's
appearance has changed substantially, and in any case at
least annually, the sheriff shall photograph the offender.
Confirmation of the in-person verification required by this
subsection, and any new photographs of the offender, shall
be transmitted by the sheriff to the division within three
(3) working days. Any person under this subsection who has
not established a residence or is transient, and who is
reporting to the sheriff as required under subsection (e)
of this section, shall be deemed in compliance with the
address verification requirements of this section.
(j) For an offender convicted of a violation of W.S.
6-2-201 if the victim was a minor, W.S. 6-2-302 or 6-2-303,
W.S. 6-2-304(a)(iii) if the victim was under fourteen (14)
years of age, W.S. 6-2-314(a)(i), W.S. 6-2-314(a)(ii) and
(iii) if the victim was less than thirteen (13) years of
age 6-2-314, W.S. 6-2-315(a)(ii), W.S. 6-2-315(a)(iii) and
(iv) if the victim was less than thirteen (13) years of age
6-2-315, W.S. 6-2-316(a)(ii) and (iii), 6-2-702 or 6-2-703,
6-4-402, 18 U.S.C. § 2245, or an offense in another
jurisdiction containing the same or similar elements, or
arising out of the same or similar facts or circumstances
as a criminal offense specified in this subsection, an
attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses
specified in this subsection, any offense enumerated in
subsection (h) of this section if the offender was
previously convicted of any offense enumerated in
subsection (g) of this section or any offense enumerated in
subsection (g) or (h) of this section if the offender was
previously convicted of any offense enumerated in
subsection (h) of this section, the division shall verify
the accuracy of the offender's registered address, and the
offender shall report, in person, his current address to
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0280
ENROLLED ACT NO. 72, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
the sheriff in the county in which the offender resides
every three (3) months after the date of the initial
release or commencement of parole. If the offender's
appearance has changed substantially, and in any case at
least annually, the sheriff shall photograph the offender.
Confirmation of the in-person verification required by this
subsection, and any new photographs of the offender, shall
be transmitted by the sheriff to the division within three
(3) working days. Any person under this subsection who has
not established a residence or is transient, and who is
reporting to the sheriff as required under subsection (e)
of this section, shall be deemed in compliance with the
address verification requirements of this section.
Section 2. This act shall only apply to offenders who
are convicted on and after the effective date of this act.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0280
ENROLLED ACT NO. 72, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4